Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6658HV (1) 91 jm/ns H.F. 2648 Section 1. Section 123.176, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter 3 or the fact that a person is the holder of a class âAâ wine 4 permit, a person engaged in the business of manufacturing 5 native wine may be granted a class âCâ retail alcohol license 6 or special class âCâ retail native wine license as defined in 7 section 123.30 for the same premises licensed under a class âAâ 8 wine permit where the manufacturing of native wine occurs. A 9 manufacturer of native wine may be granted not more than two 10 three class âCâ retail alcohol licenses or special class âCâ 11 retail native wine licenses. A manufacturer of native wine 12 may be issued a class âCâ retail alcohol license or special 13 class âCâ retail native wine license regardless of whether the 14 manufacturer is also a manufacturer of beer pursuant to a class 15 âAâ beer permit or a manufacturer of native distilled spirits 16 pursuant to a class âAâ native distilled spirits license. 17